b2g/liblouis/jni/liblouis-c/tables/B2G-gr.ctb
# Small Alpha with Perispomeni and Ypogegrammeni
lowercase \x1FB7 35
correct "\x1FB7" "\x1FC0\x1FB3"

# Capital Alpha with Vrachy
uppercase \x1FB8 1
correct "\x1FB8" "\x02D8\x0391"

# Capital Alpha with Macron
uppercase \x1FB9 1
correct "\x1FB9" "\x00AF\x0391"

# Capital Alpha with Varia
uppercase \x1FBA 1
correct "\x1FBA" "\x1FEF\x0391"

# Capital Alpha with Oxia
uppercase \x1FBB 1
correct "\x1FBB" "\x1FFD\x0391"

# Capital Alpha with Prosgegrammeni
uppercase \x1FBC 1
correct "\x1FBC" "\x1FBE\x0391"

# Small Eta with Varia and Ypogegrammeni
lowercase \x1FC2 3456
correct "\x1FC2" "\x1FEF\x1FC3"

# Small Eta with Oxia and Ypogegrammeni
lowercase \x1FC4 3456
correct "\x1FC4" "\x1FFD\x1FC3"

# Small Eta with Perispomeni
lowercase \x1FC6 345
correct "\x1FC6" "\x1FC0\x03B7"

# Small Eta with Perispomeni and Ypogegrammeni
lowercase \x1FC7 3456
correct "\x1FC7" "\x1FC0\x1FC3"

# Capital Epsilon with Varia
uppercase \x1FC8 15
correct "\x1FC8" "\x1FEF\x0395"

# Capital Epsilon with Oxia
uppercase \x1FC9 15
correct "\x1FC9" "\x1FFD\x0395"

# Capital Eta with Varia
uppercase \x1FCA 345
correct "\x1FCA" "\x1FEF\x0397"

# Capital Eta with Oxia
uppercase \x1FCB 345
correct "\x1FCB" "\x1FFD\x0397"

# Capital Eta with Prosgegrammeni
uppercase \x1FCC 345
correct "\x1FCC" "\x1FBE\x0397"

# Small Iota with Vrachy
lowercase \x1FD0 24
correct "\x1FD0" "\x02D8\x03B9"

# Small Iota with Macron
lowercase \x1FD1 24
correct "\x1FD1" "\x00AF\x03B9"

# Small Iota with Dialytika and Varia
lowercase \x1FD2 24
correct "\x1FD2" "\x00A8\x1FEF\x03B9"

# Small Iota with Dialytika and Oxia
lowercase \x1FD3 24
correct "\x1FD3" "\x00A8\x1FFD\x03B9"

# Small Iota with Perispomeni
lowercase \x1FD6 24
correct "\x1FD6" "\x1FC0\x03B9"

# Small Iota with Dialytika and Perispomeni
lowercase \x1FD7 24
correct "\x1FD7" "\x00A8\x1FC0\x03B9"

# Capital Iota with Vrachy
uppercase \x1FD8 24
correct "\x1FD8" "\x02D8\x0399"

# Capital Iota with Macron
uppercase \x1FD9 24
correct "\x1FD9" "\x00AF\x0399"

# Capital Iota with Varia
uppercase \x1FDA 24
correct "\x1FDA" "\x1FEF\x0399"

# Capital Iota with Oxia
uppercase \x1FDB 24
correct "\x1FDB" "\x1FFD\x0399"

# Small Upsilon with Vrachy
lowercase \x1FE0 13456
correct "\x1FE0" "\x02D8\x03C5"

# Small Upsilon with Macron
lowercase \x1FE1 13456
correct "\x1FE1" "\x00AF\x03C5"

# Small Upsilon with Dialytika and Varia
lowercase \x1FE2 13456
correct "\x1FE2" "\x00A8\x1FEF\x03C5"

# Small Upsilon with Dialytika and Oxia
lowercase \x1FE3 13456
correct "\x1FE3" "\x00A8\x1FFD\x03C5"

# Small Rho with Psili
lowercase \x1FE4 1235
correct "\x1FE4" "\x1FBF\x03C1"

# Small Rho with Dasia
lowercase \x1FE5 1235
correct "\x1FE5" "\x1FFE\x03C1"

# Small Upsilon with Perispomeni
lowercase \x1FE6 13456
correct "\x1FE6" "\x1FC0\x03C5"

# Small Upsilon with Dialytika and Perispomeni
lowercase \x1FE7 13456
correct "\x1FE7" "\x00A8\x1FC0\x03C5"

# Capital Upsilon with Vrachy
uppercase \x1FE8 13456
correct "\x1FE8" "\x02D8\x03A5"

# Capital Upsilon with Macron
uppercase \x1FE9 13456
correct "\x1FE9" "\x00AF\x03A5"

# Capital Upsilon with Varia
uppercase \x1FEA 13456
correct "\x1FEA" "\x1FEF\x03A5"

# Capital Upsilon with Oxia
uppercase \x1FEB 13456
correct "\x1FEB" "\x1FFD\x03A5"

# Capital Rho with Dasia
uppercase \x1FEC 1235
correct "\x1FEC" "\x1FFE\x03A1"

# Small Omega with Varia and Ypogegrammeni
lowercase \x1FF2 2456
correct "\x1FF2" "\x1FEF\x1FF3"

# Small Omega with Oxia and Ypogegrammeni
lowercase \x1FF4 2456
correct "\x1FF4" "\x1FFD\x1FF3"

# Small Omega with Perispomeni
lowercase \x1FF6 245
correct "\x1FF6" "\x1FC0\x03C9"

# Small Omega with Perispomeni and Ypogegrammeni
lowercase \x1FF7 2456
correct "\x1FF7" "\x1FC0\x1FF3"

# Capital Omicron with Varia
uppercase \x1FF8 135
correct "\x1FF8" "\x1FEF\x039F"

# Capital Omicron with Oxia
uppercase \x1FF9 135
correct "\x1FF9" "\x1FFD\x039F"

# Capital Omega with Varia
uppercase \x1FFA 245
correct "\x1FFA" "\x1FEF\x03A9"

# Capital Omega with Oxia
uppercase \x1FFB 245
correct "\x1FFB" "\x1FFD\x03A9"

# Capital Omega with Prosgegrammeni
uppercase \x1FFC 245
correct "\x1FFC" "\x1FBE\x03A9

# The capital sign should be before the accents.
pass2 @4-46 @46-4 # Varia
pass2 @5-46 @46-5 # Tonos or Oxia
pass2 @6-46 @46-6 # Perispomeni
pass2 @9[] * # remove non-combined Psili accents
pass2 @23456-46 @46-23456 # Psili and Varia
pass2 @356-46 @46-356 # Psili and Tonos or Oxia
pass2 @256-46 @46-256 # Psili and Perispomeni
pass2 @1236-46 @46-1236 # Dasia
pass2 @12356-46 @46-12356 # Dasia and Varia
pass2 @26-46 @46-26 # Dasia and Tonos or Oxia
pass2 @235-46 @46-235 # Dasia and Perispomeni

####################
# English Alphabet #
####################

noback uplow Aa 6-1,1
noback uplow Bb 6-12,12
noback uplow Cc 6-14,14
noback uplow Dd 6-145,145
noback uplow Ee 6-15,15
noback uplow Ff 6-124,124
noback uplow Gg 6-1245,1245
noback uplow Hh 6-125,125
noback uplow Ii 6-24,24
noback uplow Jj 6-245,245
noback uplow Kk 6-13,13
noback uplow Ll 6-123,123
noback uplow Mm 6-134,134
noback uplow Nn 6-1345,1345
noback uplow Oo 6-135,135
noback uplow Pp 6-1234,1234
noback uplow Qq 6-12345,12345
noback uplow Rr 6-1235,1235
noback uplow Ss 6-234,234
noback uplow Tt 6-2345,2345
noback uplow Uu 6-136,136
noback uplow Vv 6-1236,1236
noback uplow Ww 6-2456,2456
noback uplow Xx 6-1346,1346
noback uplow Yy 6-13456,13456
noback uplow Zz 6-1356,1356

class englishLetter ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz
context `%englishLetter @56
context _!$l%englishLetter @56
